Utah statutes.
76-1-303.   Time limitations for fraud or breach of fiduciary obligation --
Misconduct of public officer or employee.
(1)  If the period prescribed in Section 76-1-302 has expired, a  prosecution
may be commenced for any offense a material element of which is either fraud
or a breach of fiduciary obligation within one year after a report of the
offense has been filed with a law enforcement agency.
(2)  Subsection (1) may not extend the period of limitation as provided in
Section 76-1-302 by more than three years.
(3)  If the period prescribed in Section 76-1-301.5 or 76-1-302 has expired, a
prosecution may be commenced for:
(a)  any offense based upon misconduct in office by a public officer or public
employee:
(i)  at any time during which the defendant holds a public office or during
the period of his public employment; or
(ii)  within two years after termination of defendant's public office or
public employment.
(b)  Except as provided in Section 76-1-301.5, Subsection (3) shall not extend
the period of limitation otherwise applicable by more than three years.
